Georgia, session 2025_26, SB24.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Article 1 of Chapter 5 of Title 48 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
general provisions relative to ad valorem taxation of property, is amended in Code
Section 48-5-7.2, relating to preferential assessment for rehabilitated historic property, by
revising paragraph (4) of subsection (h) as follows:
"(4) The expiration of nine years during which the property was classified and assessed
as rehabilitated historic property; provided, however, that any such property may qualify
thereafter as rehabilitated historic property if such property is subject to subsequent
rehabilitation and qualifies under the provisions of this Code section; provided, further,
that, if approved by the governing authority of the county, the classification and
S. B. 24
- 1 -

LC 44 2898
assessment under this Code section may continue for a period of up to an additional
12 years for income-producing real property."
SECTION 2.
Said article is further amended in Code Section 48-5-7.3, relating to preferential assessment
for landmark historic property, by revising subparagraph (e)(1)(E) as follows:
"(E) The expiration of nine years during which the property was classified and assessed
as landmark historic property; provided, however, that any such property may qualify
thereafter as landmark historic property if such property is subject to subsequent
rehabilitation and qualifies under other portions of the historic properties tax incentive
program contained within the provisions of this Code section; provided, further, that,
if approved by the governing authority of the county, the classification and assessment
under this Code section may continue for a period of up to an additional 12 years for
income-producing real property."
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 24
- 2 -